Florida, session 2026, SB214.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) of section 18 215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 19 215.971âAgreements funded with federal or state 20 assistance.â 21 (1)âAn agency agreement that provides state financial 22 assistance to a recipient or subrecipient, as those terms are 23 defined in s. 215.97, or that provides federal financial 24 assistance to a subrecipient, as defined by applicable United 25 States Office of Management and Budget circulars, must include 26 all of the following: 27 (h)âIf the agency agreement provides federal or state 28 financial assistance to a county or municipality that is a rural 29 community or rural area of opportunity as those terms are 30 defined in s. 288.0656(2) or a special district located entirely 31 within such county or municipality or an independent special 32 district that provides water and wastewater services within a 33 rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s. 34 288.0656(2), a provision allowing the agency to provide for the 35 payment of invoices to such the county, municipality, or special 36 district rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s. 37 288.0656(2), for verified and eligible performance that has been 38 completed in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth 39 in the agreement. The provision is not intended to require 40 reimbursement to such county, municipality, or special district 41 for invoices paid, but to allow the agency to provide for the 42 payment of invoices due. The agency shall expedite payment 43 requests in order to facilitate the timely payment of invoices 44 received by such county, municipality, or special district. This 45 provision is included to alleviate the financial hardships that 46 such certain rural counties, and municipalities, or special 47 districts encounter when administering agreements, and must be 48 exercised by the agency if when a county, or municipality, or 49 special district located entirely within such county or 50 municipality or an independent special district that provides 51 water and wastewater services within a rural area of 52 opportunity, as that term is defined in s. 288.0656(2), 53 demonstrates financial hardship, to the extent that federal or 54 state law, rule, or other regulation allows such payments. This 55 paragraph may not be construed to alter or limit any other 56 provisions of federal or state law, rule, or other regulation. 57 Section 2.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 58 288.0656, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 59 288.0656âRural Economic Development Initiative.â 60 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 61 (e)ââRural communityâ means: 62 1.âA county with a population of 75,000 or fewer. 63 2.âA county with a population of 125,000 or fewer which is 64 contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or fewer. 65 3.âA municipality or special district within a county 66 described in subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. 67 4.âAn unincorporated federal enterprise community or an 68 incorporated rural city with a population of 25,000 or fewer and 69 an employment base focused on traditional agricultural or 70 resource-based industries, located in a county not defined as 71 rural, which has at least three or more of the economic distress 72 factors identified in paragraph (c) and verified by the 73 department. 74 5.âAn independent special district that provides water and 75 wastewater services within a rural area of opportunity. 76 77 For purposes of this paragraph, population shall be determined 78 in accordance with the most recent official estimate pursuant to 79 s. 186.901. 80 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.